California statutes. Elections Code
(2) (A) Within 150 days following each statewide general election, the county elections official shall report to the Secretary of State the number of individuals recruited to serve as members of precinct boards, including the number of individuals recruited who are fluent in each language required to be represented under Section 14201 and Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965
 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.). The Secretary of State shall issue uniform standard reporting guidelines.

(B) The Secretary of State shall post all county reports received under subparagraph (A) on the Secretary of State’s internet website within 180 days following each statewide general election.

(3) At each polling place, a member of the precinct board shall identify the languages spoken by the member, other than English, by wearing a name tag, button, sticker, lanyard, or other mechanism, as determined by the county elections official. The text indicating the language skills of the member of the precinct board shall be in the non-English language or languages spoken by that member.

(d) At least 14 days before an election, the elections official shall prepare and make available to the public a list of the precincts
 to which officials were appointed pursuant to this section, including on the county elections official’s internet website, and the language or languages other than English in which they will provide assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 55.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12304.

(a) The composition of the precinct board shall be determined by the elections official based on election precinct size. The precinct board shall consist of a minimum of one inspector and two clerks. Additional clerk positions may be allocated in proportion to the number of registered voters within the precinct.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2005.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 904, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Section operative January 1, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12306.

The county elections official of any county, in appointing members of the several precinct boards to serve in the direct primary and general elections under the provisions of this code, shall permit the county central committee of each qualified political party to nominate for appointment to the precinct board a member of that party who is registered and resident in that precinct. Nomination pursuant to this section shall be made in writing to the county elections official not less than 90 days before the election for which the nomination is made. In making
 appointments to precinct boards from nominations submitted by political parties, the county elections official shall give preference to the nominee of any qualified political party with at least 10 percent of the registered voters in the precinct for which the nomination is made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12307.

Upon filing the list of names and addresses of those who have been appointed members of the precinct board, the elections official shall immediately mail or deliver to each voter so appointed, a notice stating the appointment and the position to which assigned, the penalty for failure to serve, and any other matter that the elections official determines.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12309.

(a) Following the appointment of members of precinct boards, the elections official shall instruct inspectors so appointed concerning their duties in connection with the conduct of the election, which instruction shall conform to the uniform standards adopted by the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 12309.5.

(b) A person may not serve as an inspector of a precinct board at an election unless instruction has been received in accordance with this
 section except that, in the case of the emergency disability of a regular inspector, substitute inspectors shall be given any instruction found necessary by the elections official.

(c) At the request of the elections official, the legislative body may contract with any qualified person or organization for purposes of instructing inspectors in accordance with this section.

(d) This section shall become operative on June 30, 2005.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 530, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative June 30, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12309.5.

(a) No later than June 30, 2005, the Secretary of State shall adopt uniform standards for the training of precinct board members, based upon the recommendations of the task force appointed pursuant to subdivision (b). The uniform standards shall, at a minimum, address the following:

(1) The rights of voters, including, but not limited to, language access rights for linguistic minorities, the disabled, and protected classes as referenced and defined in the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.).

(2) Election challenge procedures such as challenging precinct administrator misconduct, fraud, bribery, or discriminatory voting procedures as referenced and defined in the federal
 Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.).

(3) Operation of a jurisdiction’s voting system, including, but not limited to, modernized voting systems, touch-screen voting, and proper tabulation procedures.

(4) Poll hours and procedures concerning the opening and closing of polling locations on election day. Procedures shall be developed that, notwithstanding long lines or delays at a polling location, ensure all eligible voters who arrive at the polling location before closing time are allowed to cast a ballot.

(5) Relevant election laws and any other subjects that will assist an inspector in carrying out his or her duties.

(6) Cultural competency, including, but not limited to, having adequate knowledge of diverse cultures, including
 languages, that may be encountered by a poll worker during the course of an election, and the appropriate skills to work with the electorate.

(7) Knowledge regarding issues confronting voters who have disabilities, including, but not limited to, access barriers and the need for reasonable accommodations.

(8) Procedures involved with provisional, fail-safe provisional, vote by mail, and provisional vote by mail voting.

(b) The Secretary of State shall appoint a task force of at least 12 members who have experience in the administration of elections and other relevant backgrounds to study and recommend uniform guidelines for the training of precinct board members. The task force shall consist of the chief elections officer of the two largest counties, the two smallest counties, and two county elections officers
 selected by the Secretary of State, or their designees. The Secretary of State shall appoint at least six other members who have elections expertise, or their designees, including members of community-based organizations that may include citizens familiar with different ethnic, cultural, and disabled populations to ensure that the task force is representative of the state’s diverse electorate. The task force shall make its recommendations available for public review and comment before the submission of the recommendations to the Secretary of State and the Legislature.

(c) The task force shall file its recommendations with the Secretary of State and the Legislature no later than January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 119.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

12310.

Each member of a precinct board shall receive compensation from the governing body of the jurisdiction. This sum shall be paid out of the treasury of the jurisdiction in which the election is held. The inspector may receive more compensation than the other members of the precinct board. The additional compensation to the inspector is for services rendered in securing precinct board members and other duties which may be directed by the elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 36.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12311.

No public agency shall be required as the result of any assignment or transfer to pay the stipend of an election officer for services to any person other than the election officer to whom the stipend is due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12312.

A person shall not be suspended or discharged from any service or employment because of absence while serving as an election officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 37.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12313.

(a) If any member of a precinct board does not appear at the opening of the polls on the morning of an election, those voters present, including members of the board, shall appoint a voter to fill the vacancy. If none of the members appointed appears at that time, the voters of the precinct present at that time may appoint a board.

(b) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 38.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12314.

The inspector may appoint a voter to replace any precinct board member who ceases to act or becomes incapacitated during the progress of an election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12315.

If the inspector ceases to act, a majority of the remaining members of the precinct board may appoint a substitute.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12316.

In constituting precinct boards, the elections official may excuse persons appointed whom the elections official is satisfied ought to be excused. Substitutions may be made when any person appointed is excused or found disqualified or incompetent, until a final or amended list of election officers is sent to the inspector for that precinct.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12318.

(a) Following the notification of the precinct board members appointed pursuant to Section 12307, the county elections official shall mail or deliver to the county central committee of each qualified political party a copy of the list, and the elections official may notify the same committee of any substitute appointments that are made until the time the notice of final order is sent to the precinct inspector. This list shall have the names of precinct board members in precinct order.

(b) In addition, the elections official shall make available a copy of the list prescribed in subdivision (a) to any person requesting a copy. Any person requesting a
 copy of the list shall sign a roster specifying his or her name, telephone number, and address, and shall provide the elections official with adequate personal identification.

(c) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 39.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12319.

The elections official shall immediately mail or deliver to each person appointed as inspector a notice showing the precinct polling place and the voters appointed to serve as election officers in that precinct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12320.

No person is eligible to act as an election officer until the declaration required by Section 12321 has been signed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12321.

(a) (1) Each inspector shall sign a declaration of intention to faithfully discharge the duties of inspector and shall return it to the elections official at least 15 days before election day or the first day of service at a vote center. If the inspector fails or refuses to sign and file the declaration, the elections official shall appoint a substitute who shall make and file the application.

(2) The declaration of an inspector and each of the declarations of other members of the precinct board provided for in this article shall be signed in the presence of a witness and shall be as binding on the signer as would be an oath of
 office.

(3) The declaration of an inspector shall be in substantially the following form:State of CaliforniaCounty of ⎱
 ⎰ss.I do hereby solemnly declare that I will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of California, and that I will to the best of my ability, faithfully discharge
 the duties of inspector for polling place or vote center ______ for the election to be held on ______, 20__. .Signed in the presence of (Signature) on ______, 20__.(b) Before entering upon the performance of duties, each of the precinct board members, other than the inspector, shall sign a declaration of intention to faithfully discharge the duties of an election officer. The
 declaration shall be signed before any member of the precinct board. The form for each of the declarations shall be provided in the roster for the polling place. The declaration of the precinct board member shall be in substantially the following form:State of CaliforniaCounty of ⎱
 ⎰ss.I do hereby solemnly declare that I will support the Constitution of the United States and the
 Constitution of the State of California, and that I will to the best of my ability, faithfully discharge the duties of precinct board member for 
 polling place or vote center______ for the election to be held on ______, 20__. .Signed in the presence of (Signature) on ______, 20__.(c) Any precinct board member may administer and certify oaths required to be administered during the progress of an election. This authorization shall include the power to give any type of oath required of a public employee. There
 shall be no fee or charge for administering an oath.

(d) In lieu of signing and returning the declaration of the inspector, as provided in this chapter, the county elections official may require the inspector to sign the declaration for an election and before entering upon the performance of these duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 40.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12327.

(a) If the precinct board members for any precinct have not been appointed or cannot serve, or the polling place has not been designated prior to an election, the county elections official shall, by written order, immediately appoint the precinct board members or designate the polling place for the precinct, as the case may require, and shall notify each precinct board member of the appointment.

(b) If, at this time, the elections official cannot make suitable arrangements for a
 polling place in any precinct in which none has been designated, the elections official may designate a polling place in any contiguous precinct. Any precinct board member serving in this polling place shall be regarded as serving in the proper precinct within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 725, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 13. BALLOTS, SAMPLE BALLOTS, AND VOTER PAMPHLETS [13000. - 13600.]



CHAPTER 1. Purchasing Procedures [13000. - 13006.]

13000.

The person in charge of elections for any county, city and county, city, or district shall provide ballots for any elections within his or her jurisdiction, and shall cause to be printed on them the name of every candidate whose name has been certified to or filed with the proper officer pursuant to law and who, therefore, is entitled to a place on the appropriate ballot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13001.

All expenses authorized and necessarily incurred in the preparation for, and conduct of, elections as provided in this code shall be paid from the county treasuries, except that when an election is called by the governing body of a city the expenses shall be paid from the treasury of the city. All payments shall be made in the same manner as other county or city expenditures are made. The elections official, in providing the materials required by this division, need not utilize the services of the county or city purchasing agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

13002.

Ballot paper and ballot cards used by a jurisdiction holding an election pursuant to the laws of California shall be tinted and watermarked or overprinted with a design, to be furnished by the Secretary of State, so that the watermark or overprint is plainly discernible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 333, Sec. 1.   (SB 1404)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13004.

(a) The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations governing the manufacture, finishing, quality standards, distribution, and inventory control of ballot cards and ballot on demand systems.

(b) A ballot printer shall not manufacture or finish ballot cards, or manufacture unfinished ballot cards, for use in California elections, or accept or solicit orders for ballot cards or unfinished ballot cards, before certification as a ballot printer by the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State may impose conditions of approval as deemed necessary by the Secretary of State.

(c) For commercial ballot manufacturers and finishers, the Secretary
 of State shall require a biennial inspection of the certified manufacturing, finishing, and storage facilities.

(d) Not later than five working days before the Secretary of State begins the initial inspection, the ballot card manufacturer or finisher shall notify or disclose to the Secretary of State in writing any known flaw or defect in its ballot card manufacturing or finishing process, or its manufactured or finished ballot cards, that could adversely affect the future casting or tallying of votes. Once approved by the Secretary of State, the ballot card manufacturer or finisher shall notify the Secretary of State and the affected local elections officials in writing within 24 hours after it discovers any flaw or defect in its ballot card manufacturing or finishing process, or its manufactured or finished ballot cards, that could adversely affect
 the future casting or tallying of votes.

(e) For purposes of this section, “ballot printer” means any company or jurisdiction that manufactures, finishes, or sells ballot cards, including test ballots, for use in an election conducted pursuant to this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 605, Sec. 3.   (SB 1328)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13004.5.

(a) A jurisdiction shall not purchase, lease, or contract for a ballot on demand system unless the ballot on demand system has been certified by the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State may impose additional conditions of approval as deemed necessary by the Secretary of State.

(b) A vendor, company, or person shall not sell, lease, or contract with a jurisdiction for the use of a ballot on demand system unless the ballot on demand system has been certified by the Secretary of State.

(c) This section does not preclude a jurisdiction from conducting research and development of a ballot on demand system. A ballot on
 demand system that is used for purposes of this subdivision shall not be used in an election conducted pursuant to this code unless the system has been certified by the Secretary of State.

(d) Once a ballot on demand system is approved by the Secretary of State, the ballot on demand system vendor shall notify the Secretary of State and the affected local elections officials in writing within 24 hours after it discovers any flaw or defect in its ballot on demand system that could adversely affect the future casting or tallying of votes.

(e) The Secretary of State shall promulgate regulations for purposes of certifying ballot on demand systems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 605, Sec. 4.   (SB 1328)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13005.

(a) Before a user may purchase ballot cards, the user shall request in writing a release for a specific quantity of these ballot cards from the Secretary of State. If the request is in order, the Secretary of State shall issue a written release for that quantity to the manufacturer, or to the authorized warehouse, and to the user. The format, text, and use of the request and release shall be governed by regulations adopted by the Secretary of State.

(b) Nothing in this section prohibits a verbal request or verbal release, provided that this verbal request or verbal release is immediately confirmed in writing. The regulations shall expressly deny the manufacturing of ballot cards
 without a specific release.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 333, Sec. 3.   (SB 1404)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13006.

A user, vendor, or manufacturer shall not warehouse for a subsequent election ballot paper or ballot cards furnished or released by the Secretary of State for a specific election without first obtaining authorization in writing from the Secretary of State for the storage. The authorization shall include the particular details of the amount to be stored so that audit controls may be established and maintained. Ballot paper or ballot cards not used in that election, not authorized to be retained for subsequent elections, and not returned to the Secretary of State, shall be destroyed. A certificate of destruction setting forth the date of destruction and the amount of the ballot paper or ballot cards destroyed shall be transmitted to the Secretary of
 State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 333, Sec. 4.   (SB 1404)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Forms of Ballots: Ballot Order [13100. - 13121.]

13100.

All ballots used in all elections shall be governed by this chapter unless otherwise specifically provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13101.

(a) In the case of the prevention of an election in any precinct by the loss or destruction of the ballots intended for that precinct, the inspector or other precinct officer for that precinct shall make an affidavit setting forth the fact and transmit it to the Governor. Upon receipt of the affidavit, the Governor may, and upon the application of any candidate for any office to be voted for by the voters of that precinct the Governor shall, order a new election in that precinct.

(b) This section does not apply to elections conducted using vote centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 41.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13102.

(a) All voting shall be by ballot. There shall be provided, at each polling place, at each election at which public officers are to be voted for, but one form of ballot for all candidates for public office, except that, for partisan primary elections, one form of ballot shall be provided for each qualified political party as well as one form of nonpartisan ballot, in accordance with subdivision (b).

(b) At partisan primary elections, each voter not registered disclosing a preference for any one of the political parties participating in the election shall be furnished only a nonpartisan ballot, unless the voter requests a ballot of a political party and that political party, by party rule duly noticed to the Secretary of State, authorizes a person who has declined to
 disclose a party preference to vote the ballot of that political party. The nonpartisan ballot shall contain only the names of all candidates for nonpartisan offices, voter-nominated offices, and measures to be voted for at the primary election. Each voter registered as preferring a political party participating in the election shall be furnished only a ballot for which the voter disclosed a party preference in accordance with Section 2151 or 2152 and the nonpartisan ballot, both of which shall be printed together as one ballot in the form prescribed by Section 13207.

(c) A political party may adopt a party rule in accordance with subdivision (b) that authorizes a person who has declined to disclose a party preference to vote the ballot of that political party at the next ensuing partisan primary election. The political party shall notify the party chair immediately upon adoption of that party rule. The party chair shall provide written notice
 of the adoption of that rule to the Secretary of State not later than the 135th day before the partisan primary election at which the vote is authorized.

(d) The county elections official shall maintain a record of which political party’s ballot was requested pursuant to subdivision (b), or whether a nonpartisan ballot was requested, by each person who declined to disclose a party preference. The record shall be made available to any person or committee who is authorized to receive copies of the printed roster for primary and general elections pursuant to Section 2184. A record produced pursuant to this subdivision shall be made available in either a printed or electronic format, as requested by the authorized person or committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 106.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13103.

Every ballot shall contain all of the following:

(a) The title of each office, arranged to conform as nearly as practicable to the plan set forth in this chapter.

(b) The names of all qualified candidates, except that:

(1) Instead of the names of candidates for delegate to the national conventions, there shall be printed the names of the presidential candidates to whom they
 are pledged or the names of candidates for chairmen of party national convention delegations.

(2) Instead of the names of candidates for presidential electors, there shall be printed in pairs the names of the candidates of the respective parties for President and Vice President of the United States. These names shall appear under the title “President and Vice President.”

(c) The titles and summaries of measures submitted to vote of the voters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13104.

(a) If a candidate changes their name within one year of any election, the new name shall not appear upon the ballot unless the change was made by either of the following:

(1) Marriage.

(2) Decree of any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) This section does not apply to candidates for the offices of President and Vice President of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 72, Sec. 2.   (SB 437)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13105.

(a) In the case of a candidate for a voter-nominated office in a primary election, a general election, or a special election to fill a vacancy in the office of United States Senator, Member of the United States House of Representatives, State Senator, or Member of the Assembly, immediately to the right of and following the name of the candidate, or immediately below the name if there is not sufficient space on the same line to the right of the name, there shall be identified in at least 8-point type, as specified by the Secretary of State, the designation made by the candidate pursuant to Section 8002.5. The identification shall be in substantially the following form:

(1) In the case of a
 candidate who designated a political party preference pursuant to Section 8002.5, “Party Preference: ______.”

(2) In the case of a candidate who did not state a preference for a political party pursuant to Section 8002.5, “Party Preference: None.”

(b) In the case of candidates for President and Vice President, the name of the party shall appear to the right of and equidistant from the pair of names of these candidates and on the same line as the name of the candidate for President, or immediately below the name of the vice presidential candidate if there is not sufficient space to the right of the name.

(c) If for a general election any candidate for President of the United States or Vice President of the United States has
 received the nomination of any additional party or parties, the name(s) shall be printed to the right of the name of the candidate’s own party, or immediately below the name if there is not sufficient space to the right of the name. Party names of a candidate shall be separated by commas. If a candidate has qualified for the ballot by virtue of an independent nomination, the word “Independent” shall be printed instead of the name of a political party in accordance with the above rules.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 14.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13106.

No title or degree shall appear on the same line on a ballot as a candidate’s name, either before or after the candidate’s name, in the case of any election to any office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13107.

(a) With the exception of candidates for Justice of the State Supreme Court or court of appeal, immediately under the name of each candidate, and not separated from the name by any line, unless the designation made by the candidate pursuant to Section 8002.5 must be listed immediately below the name of the candidate pursuant to Section 13105, and in that case immediately under the designation, may appear at the option of the candidate only one of the following designations:

(1) Words designating the elective city, county, district, state, or federal office which the candidate holds at the time of filing the nomination documents to which the candidate was elected by vote of the
 people.

(2) The word “incumbent” if the candidate is a candidate for the same office which the candidate holds at the time of filing the nomination papers, and was elected to that office by a vote of the people. A candidate shall not use the word “incumbent” if the candidate was elected to their office in an at-large election and is a candidate in a district-based election.

(3) No more than three words designating either the current principal professions, vocations, or occupations of the candidate, or the principal professions, vocations, or occupations of the candidate during the calendar year immediately preceding the filing of nomination documents.

(4) The phrase “appointed incumbent” if the candidate holds an
 office by virtue of appointment, and the candidate is a candidate for election to the same office, or, if the candidate is a candidate for election to the same office or to some other office, the word “appointed” and the title of the office. In either instance, the candidate may not use the unmodified word “incumbent” or any words designating the office unmodified by the word “appointed.” However, the phrase “appointed incumbent” shall not be required of a candidate who seeks reelection to an office which the candidate holds and to which the candidate was appointed, as a nominated candidate, in lieu of an election, pursuant to Sections 5326 and 5328 of the Education Code or Section 7228, 7423, 7673, 10229, or 10515 of this code.

(b) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), for candidates for judicial office,
 immediately under the name of each candidate, and not separated from the name by any line, only one of the following designations may appear at the option of the candidate:

(A) Words designating the city, county, district, state, or federal office held by the candidate at the time of filing the nomination documents.

(B) The word “incumbent” if the candidate is a candidate for the same office that the candidate holds at the time of filing the nomination papers.

(C) No more than three words designating either the current principal professions, vocations, or occupations of the candidate, or the principal professions, vocations, or occupations of the candidate during the calendar year immediately preceding the filing of
 nomination documents.

(2) For a candidate for judicial office who is an active member of the State Bar employed by a city, county, district, state, or by the United States, the designation shall appear as one of the following:

(A) Words designating the actual job title, as defined by statute, charter, or other governing instrument.

(B) One of the following ballot designations: “Attorney,” “Attorney at Law,” “Lawyer,” or “Counselor at Law.” The designations “Attorney” and “Lawyer” may be used in combination with one other current principal profession, vocation, or occupation of the candidate, or the principal profession, vocation, or occupation of the candidate during the calendar year immediately preceding the
 filing of nomination documents.

(3) A designation made pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) or paragraph (2) shall also contain relevant qualifiers, as follows:

(A) If the candidate is an official or employee of a city, the name of the city shall appear preceded by the words “City of.”

(B) If the candidate is an official or employee of a county, the name of the county shall appear preceded by the words “County of.”

(C) If the candidate is an official or employee of a city and county, the name of the city and county shall appear preceded by the words “City and County.”

(D) If the
 candidate performs quasi-judicial functions for a governmental agency, the full name of the agency shall be included.

(c) A candidate for superior court judge who is an active member of the State Bar and practices law as one of the candidate’s principal professions shall use one of the following ballot designations as the candidate’s ballot designation: “Attorney,” “Attorney at Law,” “Lawyer,” or “Counselor at Law.” The designations “Attorney” and “Lawyer” may be used in combination with
 one other current principal profession, vocation, or occupation of the candidate, or the principal profession, vocation, or occupation of the candidate during the calendar year immediately preceding the filing of nomination documents.

(d) For purposes of this section, all California geographical names shall be considered to be one word. Hyphenated words that appear in any generally available standard reference dictionary, published in the United States at any time within the 10 calendar years immediately preceding the election for which the words are counted, including a generally available standard reference dictionary published online, shall be
 considered as one word. Each part of all other hyphenated words shall be counted as a separate word.

(e) The Secretary of State and any other elections official shall not accept a designation of which any of the following would be true:

(1) It would mislead the voter.

(2) It would suggest an evaluation of a candidate, such as
 outstanding, leading, expert, virtuous, or eminent.

(3) It abbreviates the word “retired” or places it following any word or words which it modifies.

(4) It uses a word or prefix, such as “former” or “ex-,” which means a prior status. The only exception is the use of the word “retired.”

(5) It uses the name of any political party, whether or not it has qualified for the ballot.

(6) It uses a word or words referring to a racial, religious, or ethnic group.

(7) It refers to any activity prohibited by law.

(f) If,
 upon checking the nomination documents and the ballot designation worksheet described in Section 13107.3, the elections official finds the designation to be in violation of any of the restrictions set forth in this section, the elections official shall notify the candidate by registered or certified mail return receipt requested, addressed to the mailing address provided on the candidate’s ballot designation worksheet.

(1) The candidate shall, within three days, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and state holidays, from the date the candidate receives notice by registered or certified mail, or from the date the candidate receives actual notice of the violation, whichever occurs first, appear before the elections official or, in the case of the Secretary of State, notify the Secretary of State by telephone, and provide a designation that complies with
 subdivision (a) or (b).

(2) If a candidate fails to provide a designation that complies with subdivision (a) or (b) within the three-day period specified in paragraph (1), a designation shall not appear after the candidate’s name.

(g) A designation given by a candidate shall not be changed by the candidate after the final date for filing nomination documents, except as specifically requested by the elections official as specified in subdivision (f) or as provided in subdivision (h). The elections official shall maintain a copy of the ballot designation worksheet for each candidate that appears on the ballot in the county for the same period of time as applied to nomination documents pursuant to Section 17100.

(h) The designation shall remain the same for all purposes of both primary and general elections, unless the candidate, at least 98 days before the general election, requests in writing a different designation which the candidate is entitled to use at the time of the request.

(i) In all cases, the words so used shall be printed in a manner consistent with the space requirements of Sections 13207 and 13211.

(j) If a foreign language translation of a candidate’s designation is required under the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), as amended, to appear on the ballot in addition to the English language version, it shall be as short as possible, as consistent as is practicable with this section, and shall employ abbreviations and
 initials wherever possible in order to avoid undue length.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 479, Sec. 9.   (AB 1762)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13107.3.

(a) A candidate who submits a ballot designation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13107 shall file a ballot designation worksheet that supports the use of that ballot designation by the candidate, in a format prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(b) The ballot designation worksheet shall be filed with the elections official at the same
 time that the candidate files his or her declaration of candidacy.

(c) In the event that a candidate fails to file a ballot designation worksheet in accordance with subdivision (a), no designation shall appear under the candidate’s name on the ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 547, Sec. 3.   (AB 1572)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

13107.5.
